Utah statutes.
8-5-5.   Proceeds of resale of lots.
The proceeds from the subsequent resale of any lot or parcel, title to which
has been revested in the municipality or cemetery maintenance district under
Section 8-5-2 or 8-5-6, less the costs and expenses incurred in the
proceeding, shall become part of the permanent care and improvement fund of
the municipality or cemetery maintenance district, subject to subsequent
disposition under Title 10, Chapter 5, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Utah
Towns, Title 10, Chapter 6, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Utah Cities, or
Title 17B, Chapter 1, Part 6, Fiscal Procedures for Local Districts.
